Maine, session 132, LD934.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §683, sub-§1-C is enacted to read:
1-C. Exemption for individuals 65 years of age or older and veterans. For property
tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2026, a permanent resident of this State who is 65
years of age or older or is a veteran who served in the Armed Forces of the United States
is eligible for an exemption pursuant to this subsection.
A. As used in this subsection, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following
terms have the following meanings.
(1) "Eligible homestead" means a homestead occupied by an eligible individual.
(2) "Eligible individual" means an individual who, on April 1st of the property tax
year for which the individual is requesting an exemption, is a permanent resident
and is:
(a) Sixty-five years of age or older; or
(b) A veteran who served in the Armed Forces of the United States.
B. Notwithstanding the amount of the certified ratio provided to the bureau pursuant
to section 685, subsection 3, an eligible homestead is eligible for 100% of the
exemption amount specified in subsections 1 and 1-B.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §685, sub-§2, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 398, Pt. PPPP, §3,
is amended to read:
D. For property tax years beginning on April 1, 2022, 73% of the taxes lost by reason
of the exemptions under section 683, subsections 1 and 1‑B; and
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §685, sub-§2, ¶E, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. II, §1, is
further amended to read:
E. For property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2023, 76% of the taxes lost by
reason of the exemptions under section 683, subsections 1 and 1‑B.; and
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §685, sub-§2, ¶F is enacted to read:
F. For property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2026, 100% of the taxes lost
by reason of the exemptions under section 683, subsection 1-C.